Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.35, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Improving schools. Consistent with the requirements of this section, deleted text begin beginning June 20, 2012,deleted text end the commissioner of education must annually report to the public and the legislature best practices implemented in those schools that are identified as high performing under federal expectations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end